District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.76d

Duties and responsibilities of body artists.

(a)

Body art technicians shall perform body art procedures in a licensed body art establishment.

(b)

Body art technicians shall use single-use disposable sharps, pigments, gloves, and cleansing products while performing body art procedures on each client.

(c)

Verbal and written instructions for the care of the tattooed, pierced, or other modified sites on the body shall be provided by the body artist to each customer upon the completion of the procedure. The written instructions shall advise the customer to consult a physician at the first sign of infection or other adverse reaction and shall contain the name of the body artist and the name, address, and telephone number of the establishment.

(d)

Any person who violates this section shall be subject to disciplinary action including license suspension or revocation and a maximum fine of $2,500.

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-193, § 3(g), 59 DCR 10388